Utah statutes.


9-7-204.   State Library Board -- Members -- Meetings -- Expenses.

(1)  There is created within the department the State Library Board.

(2) (a)  The board shall consist of nine members appointed by the governor.

(b)  One member shall be appointed on recommendation from each of the following agencies:

(i)  the State Office of Education;

(ii)  the Board of Control of the State Law Library;

(iii)  the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel; and

(iv)  the Utah System of Higher Education.

(c)  Of the five remaining members at least two shall be appointed from rural areas.

(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current board members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b) The governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.

(4)  The members may not serve more than two full consecutive terms.

(5) When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term in the same manner as originally appointed.

(6)  Five members of the board constitute a quorum for conducting board business.

(7)  The governor shall select one of the board members as chair who shall serve for a period of two years.

(8)  The director of the State Library Division shall be executive officer of the board.

(9)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 324, 2010 General Session

